Utah statutes.
55-12-110.   Article 10 -- Compacting states, effective date, and amendment.
(1)  Any state, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the
U.S. Virgin Islands, Guam, American Samoa, and the Northern Marianas Islands
as defined in Section 55-12-102 is eligible to become a compacting state.
(2)  The compact shall become effective and binding upon legislative enactment
of the compact into law by no less than 35 states.  The initial effective date
shall be the later of July 1, 2004 or upon enactment into law by the 35th
jurisdiction.  Thereafter it shall become effective and binding as to any
other compacting state upon enactment of the compact into law by that state.
(3)  The governors of nonmember states or their designees shall be invited to
participate in the activities of the Interstate Commission on a nonvoting
basis prior to adoption of the compact by all states and territories of the
United States.
(4)  The commission may propose amendments to the compact for enactment by the
compacting states.  No amendment shall become effective and binding upon the
commission and the compacting states unless and until it is enacted into law
by unanimous consent of the compacting states.
